Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
JUNKYARD CONTROL

§264-81 Short title. This part may be
cited as the "Junkyard Control Act". [L 1966, c 46, pt of §2; HRS
§264-81]

Cross References

Ownership of solid waste, see chapter 340A.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next